Utah statutes.
77-38-10.   Victim's discretion.

(1) (a)  The victim may exercise any rights under this chapter at his discretion to be present and to be heard at a court proceeding, including a juvenile delinquency proceeding.

(b)  The absence of the victim at the court proceeding does not preclude the court from conducting the proceeding.

(2)  A victim shall not refuse to comply with an otherwise lawful subpoena under this chapter.

(3)  A victim shall not prevent the prosecution from complying with requests for information within a prosecutor's possession and control under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 352, 1995 General Session

